Montana, session 2025, SB111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
(Refer to Introduced Bill)
Strike everything after the enacting clause and insert:
Section 1. Section 61-9-226, MCA, is amended to read:
"61-9-226. Special restrictions on lamps -- definition. (1) A lighted lamp or illuminating device upon
a motor vehicle other than headlamps, spot lamps, auxiliary lamps, or flashing turn signals, emergency vehicle
warning lamps, and school bus warning lamps that projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than 300
candlepower must be so directed that the high intensity portion of the beam may not strike the level of the
roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than 75 feet from the vehicle.
(2) A person may not drive or move a vehicle or equipment upon a highway with:
(a) a lamp or device displaying a red light visible from in front of the center of the vehicle. This
section does not apply to a vehicle upon which a red light visible from the front is expressly authorized or
required by this code.
(b) green lights that are flashing, rotational, or continuous, except for vehicles that are authorized
by this chapter to contain the lights, including:
(i) snow-removal equipment operated by the department of transportation or another government
entity; and
(ii) a police or authorized emergency vehicle that is an on-scene incident command or control
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 111
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 111
vehicle.
(3) Flashing, blinking, sequential, rotating, or pulsating lights are prohibited except on vehicles that
are authorized by this chapter to contain the lights or on a vehicle as a means for indicating a right or left turn or
the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring unusual care in approaching, overtaking, or passing.
(4) License plate decorative lighting that is not original manufacturer's equipment or undercarriage
decorative lighting that rotates, flashes, or oscillates or that displays a color authorized by this chapter for use
by police vehicles and authorized emergency vehicles may not be illuminated on a vehicle that is operated
upon a highway or street.
(5) As used in this section "school bus" has the meaning provided in 20-10-101."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 111
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 111, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 111
INTRODUCED BY D. LOGE
AN ACT LIMITING THE USE OF GREEN LIGHTS ON PUBLIC HIGHWAYS TO SNOW REMOVAL EQUIPMENT
OPERATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION OR ANOTHER GOVERNMENT ENTITY AND
TO ON-SCENE INCIDENT COMMANDERS; AND AMENDING SECTION 61-9-226, MCA.”